local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="/šta__prn">
      <group alt="sh">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>što</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>šta</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>što</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>šta</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_BS">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>što</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>šta</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>što</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>šta</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_HR">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>što</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>šta</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>što</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>šta</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_SR">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>što</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>šta</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>što</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>šta</l>
            <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>



      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čega</l>
          <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čemu</l>
          <r>šta<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čemu</l>
          <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čim</l>
          <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čime</l>
          <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="/ko__prn">
      <group alt="sh">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>tko</l>
            <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ko</l>
            <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_BS">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>tko</l>
            <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ko</l>
            <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_HR">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>tko</l>
            <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>ko</l>
            <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_SR">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>tko</l>
            <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ko</l>
            <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koga</l>
          <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koga</l>
          <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>komu</l>
          <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kome</l>
          <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>komu</l>
          <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kome</l>
          <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kim</l>
          <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kime</l>
          <r>ko<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- noun paradigms -->

    <pardef n="rečni/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cima</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cima</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cima</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ko"><i/><par n="/ko__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="šta"><i/><par n="/šta__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="rečnik"><i>r</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>čni</i><par n="rečni/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="učenik"><i>učeni</i><par n="rečni/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lječnik"><i>lječni</i><par n="rečni/k__n"/></e>
